Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,106
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 48-192 to 48-1,109 shall be deemed to repeal any provision of law authorizing any state agency to consider, ascertain, adjust, compromise, settle, determine, allow, or pay any claim other than a workers' compensation claim as defined in sections 48-192 to 48-1,109.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 132.